Utah statutes.
53-3-505.   School license -- Contents of rules.
(1)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the commissioner shall make rules regarding the requirements for:
(a)  a school license, including requirements concerning:
(i)  locations;
(ii)  equipment;
(iii)  courses of instruction;
(iv)  instructors;
(v)  previous records of the school and instructors;
(vi)  financial statements;
(vii)  schedule of fees and charges;
(viii)  character and reputation of the operators and instructors;
(ix)  insurance as the commissioner determines necessary to protect the
interests of the public; and
(x)  other provisions the commissioner may prescribe for the protection of the
public; and
(b)  an instructor's license, including requirements concerning:
(i)  moral character;
(ii)  physical condition;
(iii)  knowledge of the courses of instruction;
(iv)  motor vehicle laws and safety principles and practices;
(v)  previous personnel and employment records; and
(vi)  other provisions the commissioner may prescribe for the protection of
the public;
(c)  applications for licenses; and
(d)  minimum standards for:
(i)  driving simulation devices that are fully interactive under Subsection
53-3-505.5(2)(b); and
(ii)  driving simulation devices that are not fully interactive under
Subsection 53-3-505.5(2)(c).
(2)  Rules made by the commissioner shall require that a commercial driver
training school offering motorcycle rider education meet or exceed the
standards established by the Motorcycle Safety Foundation.
(3)  Rules made by the commissioner shall require that an instructor of
motorcycle rider education meet or exceed the standards for certification
established by the Motorcycle Safety Foundation.
(4)  The commissioner may call upon the state superintendent of public
instruction for assistance in formulating appropriate rules.
